test/src/morphology/noun-paradis_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - vuotta: # BENA
    vuotta+N+Sg+Nom: vuotta
    vuotta+N+Sg+Gen: vuoddaga
    vuotta+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: vuoddagimme
    vuotta+N+Sg+Acc: vuoddagav
    vuotta+N+Sg+Ine: vuoddagin 
    vuotta+N+Sg+Ill: vuoddagij
    vuotta+N+Sg+Ela: vuoddagis
    vuotta+N+Sg+Com: vuoddagijn 
    vuotta+N+Pl+Nom: vuoddaga
    vuotta+N+Pl+Gen: vuoddagij
    vuotta+N+Pl+Acc: vuoddagijt
    vuotta+N+Pl+Ine: vuoddagijn
    vuotta+N+Pl+Ill: vuoddagijda
    vuotta+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: vuoddagijdasihtte 
    vuotta+N+Pl+Ela: vuoddagijs
    vuotta+N+Pl+Com: vuoddagij
    vuotta+N+Ess: vuoddagin
    vuotta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vuoddagasj
    vuotta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vuoddagattjasj
    vuotta+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: vuoddagahtá
    vuotta+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: vuoddagahtes
    vuotta+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: vuoddagahtá
    vuotta+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    vuotta+N+Abe: []

  Noun - gahttun: # GAHPER
    gahttun+N+Sg+Nom: gahttun
    gahttun+N+Sg+Gen: gahttuna
    gahttun+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gahttunimme
    gahttun+N+Sg+Acc: gahttunav
    gahttun+N+Sg+Ine: gahttunin 
    gahttun+N+Sg+Ill: gahttunij
    gahttun+N+Sg+Ela: gahttunis
    gahttun+N+Sg+Com: gahttunijn 
    gahttun+N+Pl+Nom: gahttuna
    gahttun+N+Pl+Gen: gahttunij
    gahttun+N+Pl+Acc: gahttunijt
    gahttun+N+Pl+Ine: gahttunijn
    gahttun+N+Pl+Ill: gahttunijda
    gahttun+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gahttunijdasihtte 
    gahttun+N+Pl+Ela: gahttunijs
    gahttun+N+Pl+Com: gahttunij
    gahttun+N+Ess: gahttunin
    gahttun+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gahttunasj
    gahttun+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gahttunattjasj
    gahttun+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gahttunahtá
    gahttun+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: gahttunahtes
    gahttun+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: gahttunahtá
    gahttun+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gahttun+N+Abe: []

  Noun - guoppar: # GÁMAS
    guoppar+N+Sg+Nom: guoppar
    guoppar+N+Sg+Gen: guobbara
    guoppar+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guobbarimme
    guoppar+N+Sg+Acc: guobbarav
    guoppar+N+Sg+Ine: guobbarin 
    guoppar+N+Sg+Ill: guobbarij
    guoppar+N+Sg+Ela: guobbaris
    guoppar+N+Sg+Com: guobbarijn 
    guoppar+N+Pl+Nom: guobbara
    guoppar+N+Pl+Gen: guobbarij
    guoppar+N+Pl+Acc: guobbarijt
    guoppar+N+Pl+Ine: guobbarijn
    guoppar+N+Pl+Ill: guobbarijda
    guoppar+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: guobbarijdasihtte 
    guoppar+N+Pl+Ela: guobbarijs
    guoppar+N+Pl+Com: guobbarij
    guoppar+N+Ess: guobbarin
    guoppar+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: guobbarasj
    guoppar+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: guobbarattjasj
    guoppar+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: guobbarahtá
    guoppar+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: guobbarahtes
    guoppar+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: guobbarahtá
    guoppar+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    guoppar+N+Abe: []

  Noun - hievvil: # GAHPER
    hievvil+N+Sg+Nom: hievvil
    hievvil+N+Sg+Gen: hievvila
    hievvil+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: hievvilimme
    hievvil+N+Sg+Acc: hievvilav
    hievvil+N+Sg+Ine: hievvilin 
    hievvil+N+Sg+Ill: hievvilij
    hievvil+N+Sg+Ela: hievvilis
    hievvil+N+Sg+Com: hievvilijn 
    hievvil+N+Pl+Nom: hievvila
    hievvil+N+Pl+Gen: hievvilij
    hievvil+N+Pl+Acc: hievvilijt
    hievvil+N+Pl+Ine: hievvilijn
    hievvil+N+Pl+Ill: hievvilijda
    hievvil+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: hievvilijdasihtte 
    hievvil+N+Pl+Ela: hievvilijs
    hievvil+N+Pl+Com: hievvilij
    hievvil+N+Ess: hievvilin
    hievvil+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: hievvilasj
    hievvil+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: hievvilattjasj
    hievvil+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: hievvilahtá
    hievvil+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: hievvilahtes
    hievvil+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: hievvilahtá
    hievvil+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    hievvil+N+Abe: []

  Noun - rievsak: # GAHPER
    rievsak+N+Sg+Nom: rievsak
    rievsak+N+Sg+Gen: rievsaga
    rievsak+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: rievsagimme
    rievsak+N+Sg+Acc: rievsagav
    rievsak+N+Sg+Ine: rievsagin 
    rievsak+N+Sg+Ill: rievsagij
    rievsak+N+Sg+Ela: rievsagis
    rievsak+N+Sg+Com: rievsagijn 
    rievsak+N+Pl+Nom: rievsaga
    rievsak+N+Pl+Gen: rievsagij
    rievsak+N+Pl+Acc: rievsagijt
    rievsak+N+Pl+Ine: rievsagijn
    rievsak+N+Pl+Ill: rievsagijda
    rievsak+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: rievsagijdasihtte 
    rievsak+N+Pl+Ela: rievsagijs
    rievsak+N+Pl+Com: rievsagij
    rievsak+N+Ess: rievsagin
    rievsak+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: rievsagasj
    rievsak+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: rievsagattjasj
    rievsak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: rievsagahtá
    rievsak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: rievsagahtes
    rievsak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: rievsagahtá
    rievsak+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    rievsak+N+Abe: []

  Noun - boajtok: # GAHPER
    boajtok+N+Sg+Nom: boajtok 
    boajtok+N+Sg+Ine: boajtogin 
    boajtok+N+Sg+Ill: boajtogij

  Noun - tjåttå: # BENA
    tjåttå+N+Sg+Nom: tjåttå
    tjåttå+N+Sg+Ine: tjåddågin 
    tjåttå+N+Sg+Ill: tjåddågij

  Noun - buojda: # BENA
    buojda+N+Sg+Nom: buojda 
    buojda+N+Sg+Ine: buojddagin
    buojda+N+Sg+Ill: buojddagij
    buojda+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: buojddagasj
    buojda+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: buojddagattjasj
    buojda+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: buojddagahtá
    buojda+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: buojddagahtá
    buojda+N+Abe: []

  Noun - giera: # BENA
    giera+N+Sg+Nom: giera 
    giera+N+Sg+Ine: gierragin 
    giera+N+Sg+Ill: gierragij

  Noun - deppa: # BENA
    deppa+N+Sg+Nom: deppa 
    deppa+N+Sg+Ine: dæbbagin 
    deppa+N+Sg+Ill: dæbbagij

  Noun - sievtev: # BAVSEV
    sievtev+N+Sg+Nom: sievtev 
    sievtev+N+Sg+Ine: siektimin 
    sievtev+N+Sg+Ill: siektimij

  Noun - sádev: # BAVSEV
    sádev+N+Sg+Nom: sádev 
    sádev+N+Sg+Ine: sádimin 
    sádev+N+Sg+Ill: sádimij
    sádev+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sádimasj
    sádev+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sádimattjasj
    sádev+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: sádimahtá
    sádev+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: sádimahtá
    sádev+N+Abe: []

  Noun - gårdal: # GÅRDAL
    gårdal+N+Sg+Nom: gårdal 
    gårdal+N+Sg+Ine: goarddalin 
    gårdal+N+Sg+Ill: goarddalij
    gårdal+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: goarddalasj
    gårdal+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: goarddalattjasj
    gårdal+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: goarddalahtá
    gårdal+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: goarddalahtá
    gårdal+N+Abe: []

  Noun - rábev: # RÁBEV
    rábev+N+Sg+Nom: rábev
    rábev+N+Sg+Ine: ráhpugin 
    rábev+N+Sg+Ill: ráhpugij
    rábev+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ráhpugasj
    rábev+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ráhpugattjasj
    rábev+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: ráhpugahtá
    rábev+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: ráhpugahtá
    rábev+N+Abe: []

  Noun - sekkas: # SEKKAS and GÁMAS
    sekkas+N+Sg+Nom: sekkas
    sekkas+N+Sg+Ine: [sæggásin, seggasin] #Korhonen seggasin
    sekkas+N+Sg+Ill: [sæggásij, seggasij] # Korhonen seggasij

  Noun - sjuváj: # DERDAJ
    sjuváj+N+Sg+Nom: sjuváj 
    sjuváj+N+Sg+Ine: sjuvvagin 
    sjuváj+N+Sg+Ill: sjuvvagij
    sjuváj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sjuvvagasj
    sjuváj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sjuvvagattjasj
    sjuváj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: sjuvvagahtá
    sjuváj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: sjuvvagahtes
    sjuváj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: sjuvvagahtá
    sjuváj+N+Abe: []

  Noun - guovsojvuojoj: # GUOVSOJVUOJOJ
    guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Nom: guovsojvuojoj 
    guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Ine: guovsojvuodjomin
    guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Ill: guovsojvuodjomij

  Noun - ritjas: # RITJAS
    ritjas+N+Sg+Nom: ritjas 
    ritjas+N+Sg+Ine: rihtjasin 
    ritjas+N+Sg+Ill: rihtjasij

  Noun - tsålkes: # TJÅLKES
    tsålkes+N+Sg+Nom: tsålkes 
    tsålkes+N+Sg+Ine: tsoalkkasin 
    tsålkes+N+Sg+Ill: tsoalkkasij

  Noun - báhkovájes: # VÁJES
    báhkovájes+N+Sg+Nom: báhkovájes
    báhkovájes+N+Sg+Ine: báhkovádjasin
    báhkovájes+N+Sg+Ill: báhkovádjasij

  Noun - iednep: # BÁRNEP
    iednep+N+Sg+Nom: iednep 
    iednep+N+Sg+Ine: iednebun 
    iednep+N+Sg+Ill: iednebuj
    iednep+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: iednebugahtá
    iednep+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: iednebugahtá
    iednep+N+Abe: []

  Noun - sågas: # SÅGAS
    sågas+N+Sg+Nom: sågas 
    sågas+N+Sg+Ine: sågaskin 
    sågas+N+Sg+Ill: sågaskij

  Noun - ságe: # SÁGE
    ságe+N+Sg+Nom: ságe 
    ságe+N+Sg+Ine: sáhkahin 
    ságe+N+Sg+Ill: sáhkahij

  Noun - butjes: # BUTJES
    butjes+N+Sg+Nom: butjes 
    butjes+N+Sg+Ine: buttjásin 
    butjes+N+Sg+Ill: buttjásij

  Noun - bæsoj: # BØSOJ
    bæsoj+N+Sg+Nom: bæsoj 
    bæsoj+N+Sg+Ine: bessugin 
    bæsoj+N+Sg+Ill: bessugij
